Utah statutes.
17-50-308.   Franchises for ferries and bridges.
(1)  A county may grant licenses and franchises for constructing and keeping
in repair roads, bridges, and ferries and for the taking of tolls on them.
(2)  Each person operating any toll boat or ferry for the transportation of
persons, vehicles, or livestock across any stream, river, or body of water in
this state shall obtain a franchise for its operation from the county
executive of the county in which such boat or ferry is operated.
(3)  If such boat or ferry is operated on a stream or body of water forming
the boundary line between two adjoining counties, the person operating the
boat or ferry shall obtain a franchise from the county executive of each
county.
